src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
! ---------------
!! Nouns in BASHKIR language.

LEXICON N_
 +N: px ;

LEXICON N_Е
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ләр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>нең px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ғә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>не  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>нән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>лә  px ;

LEXICON N_А
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>лар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ның px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ны  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>нан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ла  px ;

LEXICON N_Ө
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ләр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>нөң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ғә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>нө  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>нән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>лә  px ;

LEXICON N_О
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>лар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ноң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>но  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>нан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ла  px ;

LEXICON N_ЮСК
 +N+Nom:       px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ылар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ының px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ыға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ыны  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>ынан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ыла  px ;

LEXICON N_ЕЖ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>дәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>дәң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ғә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>де  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>дән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>дә  px ;

LEXICON N_АЛ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>дар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>дың px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ды  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>дан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>да  px ;

LEXICON N_ӨЖ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>дәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>дөң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ғә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>дө  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>дән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>дә  px ;

LEXICON N_ОЖ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>дар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>доң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>до  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>дан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>да  px ;

LEXICON N_ЕҘ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ҙәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ҙең px ;
 +N+Dat:%>гә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ҙе  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>ҙән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ҙә  px ;

LEXICON N_АҘ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ҙар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ҙың px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ға  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ҙы  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>ҙан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ҙа  px ;

LEXICON N_ОҘ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ҙар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ҙоң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>га  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ҙо  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>ҙан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ҙа  px ;

LEXICON N_ӨҘ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>ҙәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>ҙөң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>гә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ҙө  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>ҙән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>ҙә  px ;

LEXICON N_ЕС
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>тәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>тең px ;
 +N+Dat:%>кә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>те  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>тән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>тә  px ;

LEXICON N_ИП
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>тар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>тың px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ҡа  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>ты  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>тан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>та  px ;

LEXICON N_ӨБ
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>тәр px ;
 +N+Gen:%>төң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>кә  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>тө  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>тән px ;
 +N+Loc:%>тә  px ;

LEXICON N_ОК
 +N+Nom:      px ;
  +N+Pl:%>тар px ;
 +N+Gen:%>тоң px ;
 +N+Dat:%>ҡа  px ;
 +N+Acc:%>то  px ;
 +N+Ela:%>тан px ;
 +N+Loc:%>та  px ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON px
               # ; ! without px
 +Px1Sg:%>ым   # ;
 +Px2Sg:%>ың   # ;
 +Px3Sg:%>ы    # ;
 +Px1Pl:%>ыбыҙ # ;
 +Px2Pl:%>ығыҙ # ;
 +Px3Pl:%>ы    # ;
