src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
литва N_А ;
ҡарға N_А ;
аренда N_А ;
ҡаза N_А ;
кофта-юбка:кофта-#юбка N_А ;
контрразведка N_А ;
кибернетика N_А ;
буранка N_А ;
пипетка N_А ;
ыжыҡа N_А ;
травма N_А ;
фирма N_А ;
кесаҙна N_А ;
гагара N_А ;
аббревиатура N_А ;
муйынса N_А ;
тригетерозигота N_А ;
депеша N_А ;
сурдопедагог N_ОК ;
спелеолог N_ОК ;
гинеколог N_ОК ;
зоолог N_ОК ;
невропатолог N_ОК ;
носорог N_ОК ;
вклад N_ИП ;
углевод N_ОК ;
йод N_ОК ;
вездеход N_ОК ;
разряд N_ИП ;
йөҙ N_ӨҘ ;
көйөҙ N_ӨҘ ;
көҙ N_ӨҘ ;
өй-төҙ:өй-#төҙ N_ӨҘ ;
һигеҙгүҙ N_АҘ ;
ҡубыҙ N_АҘ ;
егет-ҡыҙ:егет-#ҡыҙ N_АҘ ;
эҙ N_АҘ ;
һүренде N_Е ;
партсобрание N_Е ;
полномочие N_Е ;
шешке N_Е ;
эне N_Е ;
йәнлексе N_Е ;
бәдеүәмсе N_Е ;
дегетсе N_Е ;
сигеүсе N_Е ;
һөйөүсе N_Е ;
мискәсе N_Е ;
фикһе N_Е ;
таж N_АЛ ;
пляж N_АЛ ;
саз N_АЛ ;
обрез N_ЕЖ ;
каприз N_АЛ ;
анабиоз N_ОЖ ;
токсоплазмоз N_ОЖ ;
артериосклероз N_ОЖ ;
совхоз N_ОЖ ;
башпотребсоюз N_АЛ ;
ҡарағай N_АҘ ;
ағас-һылыуҡай:ағас-#һылыуҡай N_АҘ ;
ауылнай N_АҘ ;
муҡсай N_АҘ ;
һартай N_АҘ ;
ей N_ЕҘ ;
жокей N_ЕҘ ;
пәрей N_ЕҘ ;
парикмахерский N_АҘ ;
дендрарий N_АҘ ;
командующий N_АҘ ;
забой N_ОҘ ;
звеньевой N_ОҘ ;
мостовой N_ОҘ ;
алой N_ОҘ ;
герой N_ОҘ ;
өй N_ӨҘ ;
гөрзөй N_ӨҘ ;
йөй N_ӨҘ ;
көй N_ӨҘ ;
моң-көй:моң-#көй N_ӨҘ ;
мөгөлөй N_ӨҘ ;
өлпөй N_ӨҘ ;
сөй N_ӨҘ ;
көрсөй N_ӨҘ ;
сикәсөй N_ӨҘ ;
көртөй N_ӨҘ ;
тызый N_АҘ ;
ҡаурый N_АҘ ;
бүгәй N_ЕҘ ;
йәнекәй N_ЕҘ ;
кинйәкәй N_ЕҘ ;
түмһәкәй N_ЕҘ ;
ҡартинәй N_ЕҘ ;
эт-бесәй:эт-#бесәй N_ЕҘ ;
атай-әсәй:атай-#әсәй N_ЕҘ ;
әсәйһеҙлек N_ЕС ;
үткелек N_ЕС ;
милекселек N_ЕС ;
мәжүсилек N_ЕС ;
еңеллек N_ЕС ;
кәфенлек N_ЕС ;
йәнлек N_ЕС ;
йәберлек N_ЕС ;
ир-егетлек:ир-#егетлек N_ЕС ;
кәләшлек N_ЕС ;
берәмек N_ЕС ;
гөрләүек N_ЕС ;
дальтоник N_ИП ;
стеклопластик N_ИП ;
эхинококк N_ОК ;
станок N_ОК ;
значок N_ОК ;
йөҙөк N_ӨБ ;
йөк N_ӨБ ;
һөҙлөк N_ӨБ ;
көсһөҙлөк N_ӨБ ;
төҙөклөк N_ӨБ ;
көнсөллөк N_ӨБ ;
көнлөк N_ӨБ ;
өҫтөнлөк N_ӨБ ;
төшөнкөлөк N_ӨБ ;
йөклөлөк N_ӨБ ;
көслөлөк N_ӨБ ;
бөлгөнсөлөк N_ӨБ ;
һөтсөлөк N_ӨБ ;
өрлөк N_ӨБ ;
төҫмөрлөк N_ӨБ ;
өслөк N_ӨБ ;
хаҡлыҡ-дөрөҫлөк:хаҡлыҡ-#дөрөҫлөк N_ӨБ ;
мөйөшлөк N_ӨБ ;
төкөрөк N_ӨБ ;
гөктөрөк N_ӨБ ;
төйөрсөк N_ӨБ ;
моллюск N_ЮСК ;
кристалл-үҙәк:кристалл-#үҙәк N_ЕС ;
икмәк N_ЕС ;
көрәк N_ЕС ;
аҡ N_ИП ;
сыртлаҡ N_ИП ;
сәс-япраҡ:сәс-#япраҡ N_ИП ;
шәүеҡ N_ЕС ;
тоҙлоҡ N_ОК ;
ҡомлоҡ N_ОК ;
йотҡолоҡ N_ОК ;
йорлоҡ N_ОК ;
ҡыҙылғойроҡ N_ОК ;
тороҡ N_ОК ;
ҡотоҡ N_ОК ;
талсыбыҡ N_ИП ;
архимедлыҡ N_ИП ;
таҡлыҡ N_ИП ;
айырымланғанлыҡ N_ИП ;
секретарлыҡ N_ИП ;
хитлыҡ N_ИП ;
аңлатмалылыҡ N_ИП ;
гегемониясылыҡ N_ИП ;
яҫтыҡ N_ИП ;
ҡандал N_АЛ ;
шауҡал N_АЛ ;
оригинал N_АЛ ;
капрал N_АЛ ;
децибел N_ЕЖ ;
санузел N_ЕЖ ;
мүшмел N_ЕЖ ;
күкһәүел N_ЕЖ ;
ябраил N_АЛ ;
рутил N_АЛ ;
гандбол N_ОЖ ;
татар-монгол:татар-#монгол N_ОЖ ;
колокол N_ОЖ ;
комсомол N_ОЖ ;
тол N_ОЖ ;
һол N_ОЖ ;
өмбөл N_ӨЖ ;
гөл N_ӨЖ ;
ярангөл N_ӨЖ ;
ҡайынгөл N_ӨЖ ;
ағас-гөл:ағас-#гөл N_ӨЖ ;
үрмәгөл N_ӨЖ ;
һөнәр-шөғөл:һөнәр-#шөғөл N_ӨЖ ;
көл N_ӨЖ ;
мөл N_ӨЖ ;
ғөсөл N_ӨЖ ;
ҡул N_АЛ ;
һырғауыл N_АЛ ;
биҙәл N_ЕЖ ;
дәүмәл N_ЕЖ ;
әхүәл N_ЕЖ ;
имам N_АЛ ;
реквием N_ЕЖ ;
ғилем N_ЕЖ ;
крем N_ЕЖ ;
етем N_ЕЖ ;
реализм N_АЛ ;
иллюзионизм N_АЛ ;
эклектизм N_АЛ ;
рәхим N_АЛ ;
обком N_ОЖ ;
волисполком N_ОЖ ;
профком N_ОЖ ;
йәбер-золом:йәбер-#золом N_ОЖ ;
ғалим-агроном:ғалим-#агроном N_ОЖ ;
синдром N_ОЖ ;
хром N_ОЖ ;
йотом N_ОЖ ;
бөгөм N_ӨЖ ;
өйөм N_ӨЖ ;
өйкөм N_ӨЖ ;
һөйкөм N_ӨЖ ;
хөкөм N_ӨЖ ;
төркөм-төркөм:төркөм-#төркөм N_ӨЖ ;
һөйлөм N_ӨЖ ;
өшкөрөм-төкөрөм:өшкөрөм-#төкөрөм N_ӨЖ ;
сөрөм N_ӨЖ ;
шөйтөм N_ӨЖ ;
төшөм N_ӨЖ ;
килем-төшөм:килем-#төшөм N_ӨЖ ;
һуғым N_АЛ ;
яуым N_АЛ ;
ғәдәм N_ЕЖ ;
биләм N_ЕЖ ;
күлдәк-ғәләм:күлдәк-#ғәләм N_ЕЖ ;
тәм N_ЕЖ ;
туған N_АЛ ;
ҡыуаҡан N_АЛ ;
ҡыр-ялан:ҡыр-#ялан N_АЛ ;
боцман N_АЛ ;
сальварсан N_АЛ ;
иҫәп-һан:иҫәп-#һан N_АЛ ;
ген N_ЕЖ ;
дүнәжен N_ЕЖ ;
елен N_ЕЖ ;
джентльмен N_ЕЖ ;
мәрсен N_ЕЖ ;
олигоцен N_ЕЖ ;
ванилин N_АЛ ;
дерматин N_АЛ ;
загон N_ОЖ ;
хамелеон N_ОЖ ;
гидроксид-ион:гидроксид-#ион N_ОЖ ;
аттракцион N_ОЖ ;
осҡон N_ОЖ ;
олон N_ОЖ ;
ксенон N_ОЖ ;
морон N_ОЖ ;
электрон N_ОЖ ;
ацетон N_ОЖ ;
обертон N_ОЖ ;
шифон N_ОЖ ;
өн N_ӨЖ ;
һөргөн N_ӨЖ ;
йөн N_ӨЖ ;
төйөн N_ӨЖ ;
кеше-көн:кеше-#көн N_ӨЖ ;
көн-көн:көн-#көн N_ӨЖ ;
көрөн N_ӨЖ ;
төн N_ӨЖ ;
һөйһөн N_ӨЖ ;
горн N_ОЖ ;
шатун N_АЛ ;
һарын N_АЛ ;
шәүлегән N_ЕЖ ;
күгән N_ЕЖ ;
бөрйән N_ЕЖ ;
аҡселән N_ЕЖ ;
танса-фәлән:танса-#фәлән N_ЕЖ ;
урын-фәлән:урын-#фәлән N_ЕЖ ;
кәңәшмә-фәлән:кәңәшмә-#фәлән N_ЕЖ ;
эҙәрмән N_ЕЖ ;
тән N_ЕЖ ;
гөлбаҙыян N_АЛ ;
агрономия-производство:агрономия-#производство N_О ;
художество N_О ;
ведомство N_О ;
искусство N_О ;
иго N_О ;
фламинго N_О ;
уй-тойғо:уй-#тойғо N_О ;
ҡорғо N_О ;
дзюдо N_О ;
радио N_О ;
каприччио N_О ;
йоҡо N_О ;
отҡо N_О ;
повидло N_О ;
һоло N_О ;
эскимо N_О ;
судно N_О ;
кино N_О ;
сукно N_О ;
кимоно N_О ;
гестапо N_О ;
тана-торпо:тана-#торпо N_О ;
оғро N_О ;
оро N_О ;
ситро N_О ;
партбюро N_О ;
ҡойроҡсо N_О ;
им-томсо:им-#томсо N_О ;
ҡотҡосо N_О ;
ҡортсо N_О ;
йоғонто N_О ;
либретто N_О ;
һаба-көбө:һаба-#көбө N_Ө ;
көҙгө N_Ө ;
һөҙгө N_Ө ;
көжгө N_Ө ;
өлгө N_Ө ;
һөлгө N_Ө ;
һөңгө N_Ө ;
ҡарағай-һөңгө:ҡарағай-#һөңгө N_Ө ;
ҡылыс-һөңгө:ҡылыс-#һөңгө N_Ө ;
дөгө N_Ө ;
һөргө N_Ө ;
гөрөлдө N_Ө ;
өҙө N_Ө ;
өлкө N_Ө ;
уйын-көлкө:уйын-#көлкө N_Ө ;
өкө N_Ө ;
мөкө N_Ө ;
төрткө N_Ө ;
шөшлө N_Ө ;
өлпө N_Ө ;
төрпө N_Ө ;
өбөрө N_Ө ;
көйсө N_Ө ;
көнлөксө N_Ө ;
йөрөксө N_Ө ;
йөргөнсө N_Ө ;
һөйөнсө N_Ө ;
әсе-сөсө:әсе-#сөсө N_Ө ;
сөгөлдөрсө N_Ө ;
бөркөтсө N_Ө ;
өлөшсө N_Ө ;
шөйтө N_Ө ;
полип N_ИП ;
радиотелескоп N_ОК ;
дороп N_ОК ;
көп N_ӨБ ;
антиквар N_АҘ ;
тарафдар N_АҘ ;
назар N_АҘ ;
буралылар N_АҘ ;
сынар N_АҘ ;
монгол-татар:монгол-#татар N_АҘ ;
януар N_АҘ ;
шедевр N_ЕҘ ;
олеандр N_АҘ ;
кивер N_ЕҘ ;
эспандер N_ЕҘ ;
лазер N_ЕҘ ;
телмәр-фекер:телмәр-#фекер N_ЕҘ ;
тралер N_ЕҘ ;
суфлер N_ЕҘ ;
гүмер N_ЕҘ ;
карабинер N_ЕҘ ;
зоотехник-селекционер:зоотехник-#селекционер N_ЕҘ ;
миллиампер N_ЕҘ ;
кинорежиссер N_ЕҘ ;
кондитер N_ЕҘ ;
партер N_ЕҘ ;
түңгәүер N_ЕҘ ;
кишер N_ЕҘ ;
тәғзир N_АҘ ;
эликсир N_АҘ ;
тәьхир N_АҘ ;
двор N_ОҘ ;
зимагор N_ОҘ ;
мажор N_ОҘ ;
майор N_ОҘ ;
хлор N_ОҘ ;
донор N_ОҘ ;
сор N_ОҘ ;
элеватор N_ОҘ ;
дегазатор N_ОҘ ;
стилизатор N_ОҘ ;
пульверизатор N_ОҘ ;
фтизиатор N_ОҘ ;
ректификатор N_ОҘ ;
трансформатор N_ОҘ ;
детонатор N_ОҘ ;
интегратор N_ОҘ ;
оператор N_ОҘ ;
декоратор N_ОҘ ;
инкассатор N_ОҘ ;
радиокомментатор N_ОҘ ;
экспедитор N_ОҘ ;
редактор N_ОҘ ;
инжектор N_ОҘ ;
диктор N_ОҘ ;
акцептор N_ОҘ ;
аккумулятор N_ОҘ ;
гөмбөр N_ӨҘ ;
дөмбөр N_ӨҘ ;
дөңгөр N_ӨҘ ;
шөңгөр N_ӨҘ ;
мөншөгөр N_ӨҘ ;
сөгөлдөр N_ӨҘ ;
бөҙөр N_ӨҘ ;
шөҙөр N_ӨҘ ;
бөйөр N_ӨҘ ;
төйөр N_ӨҘ ;
һөмөр N_ӨҘ ;
өнөр N_ӨҘ ;
төр N_ӨҘ ;
көфөр N_ӨҘ ;
мөһөр N_ӨҘ ;
ғөшөр N_ӨҘ ;
газометр N_ЕҘ ;
фетр N_ЕҘ ;
тамбур N_АҘ ;
филүр N_АҘ ;
айҙыр N_АҘ ;
ҡамыр N_АҘ ;
йөрәк-бауыр:йөрәк-#бауыр N_АҘ ;
сеҙәр N_ЕҘ ;
зөлфәҡәр N_ЕҘ ;
битәр N_ЕҘ ;
скаляр N_АҘ ;
этәргес N_ЕС ;
биҙәүес N_ЕС ;
мис N_ИП ;
борғос N_ОК ;
космос N_ОК ;
трос N_ОК ;
өңгөс N_ӨБ ;
көс N_ӨБ ;
онтағыс N_ИП ;
вальс N_ИП ;
кәрләс N_ЕС ;
өҫ N_ӨБ ;
сармат N_ИП ;
ухыуат N_ИП ;
ыҫмала-дегет:ыҫмала-#дегет N_ЕС ;
портмонет N_ЕС ;
сит N_ИП ;
аспект N_ЕС ;
фермент N_ЕС ;
ротапринт N_ИП ;
ремонт N_ОК ;
йот N_ОК ;
ҡар-болот:ҡар-#болот N_ОК ;
фокстрот N_ОК ;
бөркөт N_ӨБ ;
ҡатыҡ-һөт:ҡатыҡ-#һөт N_ӨБ ;
транспорт N_ОК ;
иранист N_ИП ;
институт N_ИП ;
сәнғәт N_ЕС ;
хиссиәт N_ЕС ;
хәсләт N_ЕС ;
диянәт N_ЕС ;
ҡиәфәт N_ЕС ;
ҡарлау N_А ;
сарпыу N_А ;
битләү N_А ;
шлиф N_ИП ;
дөх N_ӨБ ;
ҡыҙылармеец N_ЕС ;
һолобаш N_ИП ;
әсеүташ N_ИП ;
үлеш N_ЕС ;
кәбәкҡош N_ОК ;
алтымөйөш N_ӨБ ;
алтын-көмөш:алтын-#көмөш N_ӨБ ;
өн-төш:өн-#төш N_ӨБ ;
уҙмыш N_ИП ;
дуҫ-иптәш:дуҫ-#иптәш N_ЕС ;
ялпы N_А ;
йырсы-ҡурайсы:йырсы-#ҡурайсы N_А ;
һунарсы N_А ;
оҙатыусы N_А ;
роль N_ОК ;
рояль N_ИП ;
йәзбә N_Е ;
еңгә N_Е ;
хоҙаүәндә N_Е ;
кәзә N_Е ;
хашиә N_Е ;
терпебикә N_Е ;
сәстәңкә N_Е ;
көрпәситкә N_Е ;
кернәкә N_Е ;
теллә N_Е ;
фалнамә N_Е ;
өймә N_Е ;
бөрмә N_Е ;
һөйрәтмә N_Е ;
ғөләмә N_Е ;
фетнә N_Е ;
зәррә N_Е ;
бирсә N_Е ;
иртә N_Е ;
нәшә N_Е ;
гидробиология N_А ;
контузия N_А ;
серия N_А ;
демография N_А ;
комбинация N_А ;
лекция N_А ;
туя N_А ;
ркп N_ ;
рапп-воапп:рапп-#воапп N_ ;
рапп N_ ;
